Utah statutes.
76-6-505.   Issuing a bad check or draft -- Presumption.

(1) (a)  Any person who issues or passes a check or draft for the payment of money, for the purpose of obtaining from any person, firm, partnership, or corporation, any money, property, or other thing of value or paying for any services, wages, salary, labor, or rent, knowing it will not be paid by the drawee and payment is refused by the drawee, is guilty of issuing a bad check or draft.

(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (1), a person who issues a check or draft for which payment is refused by the drawee is presumed to know the check or draft would not be paid if he had no account with the drawee at the time of issue.

(2)  Any person who issues or passes a check or draft for the payment of money, for the purpose of obtaining from any person, firm, partnership, or corporation, any money, property, or other thing of value or paying for any services, wages, salary, labor, or rent, payment of which check or draft is legally refused by the drawee, is guilty of issuing a bad check or draft if he fails to make good and actual payment to the payee in the amount of the refused check or draft within 14 days of his receiving actual notice of the check or draft's nonpayment.

(3)  An offense of issuing a bad check or draft shall be punished as follows:

(a)  If the check or draft or series of checks or drafts made or drawn in this state within a period not exceeding six months amounts to a sum that is less than $500, the offense is a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  If the check or draft or checks or drafts made or drawn in this state within a period not exceeding six months amounts to a sum that is or exceeds $500 but is less than $1,500, the offense is a class A misdemeanor.

(c)  If the check or draft or checks or drafts made or drawn in this state within a period not exceeding six months amounts to a sum that is or exceeds $1,500 but is less than $5,000, the offense is a felony of the third degree.

(d)  If the check or draft or checks or drafts made or drawn in this state within a period not exceeding six months amounts to a sum that is or exceeds $5,000, the offense is a second degree felony.

